Utah statutes.
31A-8-105.   General powers of organizations.
Organizations may:
(1)  buy, sell, lease, encumber, construct, renovate, operate, or maintain
hospitals, health care clinics, other health care facilities, and other real
and personal property incidental to and reasonably necessary for the
transaction of the business and for the accomplishment of the purposes of the
organization;
(2)  furnish health care through providers which are under contract with the
organization;
(3)  contract with insurance companies licensed in this state or with health
service corporations authorized to do business in this state for insurance,
indemnity, or reimbursement for the cost of health care furnished by the
organization;
(4)  offer to its enrollees, in addition to health care, insured indemnity
benefits, but only for emergency care, out-of-area coverage, unusual or
infrequently used health services as defined in  Section 31A-8-101, and
adoption benefits as provided in Section 31A-22-610.1;
(5)  receive from governmental or private agencies payments covering all or
part of the cost of the health care furnished by the organization;
(6)  lend money to a medical group under contract with it or with a
corporation under its control to acquire or construct health care facilities
or for other uses to further its program of providing health care services to
its enrollees;
(7)  be owned jointly by health care professionals and persons not
professionally licensed without violating Utah law; and
(8)  do all other things necessary for the accomplishment of the purposes of
the organization.
